Missouri, session 2026, HB2230.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapters 160, 162, and 186, RSMo, are amended
by adding thereto four new sections, to be known as sections
160.068, 162.192, 186.085, and 186.095, to read as follows:
160.068. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Student Screen-Time Standards Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Instructional technology", a laptop, tablet,
computer, Chromebook, smart device, software platform, or
other similar device or platform used for student learning;
(2) "Manipulatives", hands-on physical learning items
including, but not limited to, blocks, counters, cubes,
rulers, cards, science materials, and similar educational
tools;
(3) "Traditional materials", printed books, paper-
based workbooks, notebooks, handwriting materials, and
physical educational resources.
3. For elementary school students in kindergarten
through grade five, each school district and charter school
shall adopt a written screen time and instructional

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 2
technology policy consistent with this section to promote
the educational interests of students, prevent the harmful
effects of screen time on child development, ensure that
technology supports rather than supplants foundational
learning, and restore evidence-based practices. The screen
time and instructional technology policy shall establish the
following:
(1) Limits and restrictions on student screen time and
student use of instructional technology during the school
day;
(2) Limits and restrictions on school district- or
charter school-issued devices or school district or charter
school educational technology being used outside the school
day;
(3) Limits and restrictions on student access to
internet-connected instructional technology;
(4) The digital platforms used;
(5) Standards and requirements for student use of
manipulatives and traditional materials;
(6) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain
information regarding his or her child's screen time and
instructional technology use and the process for a parent or
guardian to limit or eliminate his or her child's screen
time and instructional technology use; and
(7) The research, evidence, and information upon which
the policy is based.
4. In creating the policy, the district or charter
school shall consider and document research on best
practices in literacy instruction, instructional technology,
and assessment and the optimal role for the use of
handwriting and cursive writing in promoting literacy for
all students.

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 3
5. Each elementary school shall notify parents and
guardians annually of the policy adopted under subsection 3
of this section. Parents and guardians of students in
grades kindergarten through five may, upon request, receive
information about their child's login time and use of
district-provided instructional technology and online
learning platforms. The district or charter school shall
provide such available information within a reasonable time
and at no cost to the parent or guardian.
6. Each elementary school shall publish such policy on
such school's website.
7. Each policy adopted under subsection 3 of this
section shall be periodically updated, including
incorporating the best practices recommendations from the
recommended model school board policy on screen time and use
of technology in instruction from the framework on classroom
use of screens (FOCUS) council created under section
186.095, when such recommendations become available.
8. This section shall be implemented before the end of
the 2027-28 school year and shall apply for all subsequent
school years.
9. This section shall not apply to virtual instruction
programs operating under the provisions of section 161.670.
162.192. 1. For purposes of this section, "financial
ledger" means a searchable, machine-readable, publicly
accessible database maintained by a school district or
charter school that:
(1) Sets forth all financial transactions conducted
with school district or charter school funds, including, but
not limited to, the school funds established pursuant to
section 165.011;

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 4
(2) Is available without login credentials,
registration, or fees;
(3) Is downloadable and exportable in formats
including, but not limited to, comma-separated values (CSV)
format and Microsoft Excel format;
(4) Records all transactions using Missouri financial
accounting manual classification categories, as applicable;
and
(5) Includes the following minimum required data
fields for each financial transaction, and is searchable and
filterable by such fields, at minimum:
(a) Transaction date;
(b) Transaction amount;
(c) Revenue or expenditure designation;
(d) Fund code;
(e) Function code;
(f) Object code;
(g) Vendor or payee name; and
(h) Description or memo field.
2. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the
contrary, each school district and charter school shall
maintain a financial ledger on its publicly accessible
website. The homepage of each public or charter school's
website shall include a direct link to the financial ledger
of the school district or charter school that has oversight
responsibility for that public or charter school. The link
shall make the financial ledger accessible within one click,
shall be clearly labeled as a link to the school district's
or charter school's financial ledger, and shall be
functional and mobile-responsive. The department may
provide standardized language or icons that public and

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 5
charter schools may use for the purpose of ensuring
compliance with this subsection.
3. A school district's or charter school's financial
ledger shall be updated at least monthly. Details of each
calendar month's financial transactions shall be posted no
later than forty-five days after the close of that calendar
month.
4. For historical record keeping purposes, a school
district or charter school shall maintain complete financial
ledger data on its publicly accessible website for no fewer
than five prior fiscal years.
5. A school district or charter school may redact
protected personal information on the financial ledger only
to the extent required by applicable law. Vendor names,
amounts, and accounting codes shall not be redacted.
Payroll data may be presented in aggregated form where
disclosure of individual information is restricted.
6. Debt obligations shall be posted in a separate
section of the financial ledger, with disclosure of the
following information:
(1) Outstanding debt balances;
(2) Issuance dates;
(3) Repayment schedules;
(4) Annual debt service amounts; and
(5) Debt service as a percentage of total expenditures.
7. The department may provide or approve standardized
templates or platforms a school district or charter school
may use to comply with the provisions of this section. A
school district or charter school may use a third-party
template or platform that is approved by the department.

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 6
8. The department may provide guidance to assist
school districts and charter schools in complying with the
provisions of this section. Such guidance may include:
(1) High-level expenditure summaries by classification
category under the Missouri financial accounting manual;
(2) Standardized definitions of terms to be used in
the financial ledger; and
(3) Clear explanations of methodology and limitations
applicable to the compilation and presentation of financial
ledger data.
9. School districts and charter schools shall annually
certify compliance with this section to the department. The
department shall promulgate rules establishing procedures
and timelines for school districts and charter schools to
certify compliance.
10. If the department finds that any school district
or charter school has violated a provision of this section,
the department may withhold up to one percent of the state
aid to which the school district or charter school is
entitled under chapter 160 or 163 for the current school
year until the school district or charter school proves to
the satisfaction of the department that the school district
or charter school is no longer in violation of this section.
11. The department shall establish a process for
members of the public to file complaints with the department
if they believe a school district or charter school has
violated any provision of this section. The department may
establish a public compliance dashboard on the department's
website to enable members of the public to check whether a
particular school district or charter school is certified as
100 in compliance with the provisions of this section.

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 7
101 12. The department shall promulgate rules to implement
102 the provisions of this section. Any rule or portion of a
103 rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
104 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
105 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
106 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
107 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
108 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
109 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
110 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
111 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
112 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
113 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
186.085. The literacy advisory council established
under section 186.080 shall provide advice on the inclusion
of instruction and assessment of cursive writing and
reading, including the optimal role for the use of cursive
writing and reading in promoting literacy for all students.
Such advice shall include recommendations for a related
model policy on cursive.
186.095. 1. The commissioner of education shall
establish a "Framework on Classroom Use of Screens Council"
or "FOCUS Council". The council shall consist of the
commissioner, or the commissioner's designee, who shall
serve as chair of the council. The other members of the
council shall be appointed as specified in this subsection
and shall include the following:
(1) One parent of a child currently enrolled in grades
kindergarten through grade five shall be selected by the
president pro tempore of the senate;

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 8
(2) One parent of a child currently enrolled in grades
kindergarten through grade five shall be selected by the
speaker of the house of representatives;
(3) One education professional selected by the state
board of education from names submitted to it by the
professional teachers' organizations of the state;
(4) One education professional selected by a statewide
association of Missouri school boards;
(5) One education professional selected by the state
board of education from names submitted to it by a statewide
coalition of school administrators;
(6) Two education professionals selected by the
president pro tempore of the senate in addition to the
member selected under subdivision (1) of this subsection;
(7) Two education professionals selected by the
speaker of the house of representatives in addition to the
member selected under subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(8) One education professional selected by the
governor;
(9) One education professional selected by the
lieutenant governor;
(10) One education professional selected by the
commissioner of higher education;
(11) One education professional selected by the state
board of education from names submitted to it by nationally
recognized career and technical education student
organizations operating in Missouri;
(12) One education professional selected by the state
board of education from names submitted to it by the heads
of state-approved baccalaureate-level teacher preparation
programs located in Missouri;

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 9
(13) A pediatric mental health professional or board-
certified behavioral analyst licensed in the state,
preferably with experience in technology and behavioral
responses, selected by the speaker of the house of
representatives; and
(14) A medical professional with expertise in child
health and development selected by the governor.
2. The department of elementary and secondary
education shall provide necessary staff and resources for
the work of the advisory council.
3. (1) The council shall meet at least four times per
year in its initial year and at least twice per year
thereafter to conduct a comprehensive survey and analysis of
screen time and instructional technology use in public
schools and to review best practices regarding screen use
and the use of technology in instruction and related policy
provisions. Items and information related to such best
practices and policies shall include, but not be limited to:
(a) Impacts on educational outcomes;
(b) Impacts on behavioral and discipline outcomes;
(c) Impacts on special education;
(d) Impacts on early childhood brain development,
including reading and writing skills;
(e) The deterioration of student competency in
reading, writing, arithmetic, and science;
(f) The need to strengthen human connection in
classrooms and support healthy, respectful relationships;
(g) The isolation of students in a digital and virtual
world; and
(h) Other such items and information to be determined
by the council.

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 10
(2) The council shall meet for the first time for
purposes of this subsection before December 1, 2026, and the
whole council or a subcommittee thereof shall hold at least
three additional meetings for purposes of this subsection
before July 1, 2027.
(3) On or before July 1, 2027, the council shall
submit a report containing the council's actions, findings,
recommendations, and policy proposals to the state board of
education, the governor, and the joint committee on
education.
(4) The recommendations shall include a recommended
model school board policy on screen time and instructional
technology use. The model policy shall recommend best
practices regarding:
(a) Student screen time;
(b) Student use of instructional technology;
(c) Restrictions on student screen time;
(d) Restrictions on student use of instructional
technology;
(e) Restrictions on student access to internet-
connected instructional technology;
(f) Student use of manipulatives and traditional
materials, as such terms are defined in section 160.068;
(g) The process for a parent or guardian to obtain
information regarding his or her child's screen time and
instructional technology use;
(h) Minimizing or eliminating school district- or
100 charter school-issued devices or school district or charter
101 school educational technology being used outside the school
102 day; and

SCS HCS HBs 2230 & 2978 11
103 (i) The process for a parent or guardian to limit or
104 eliminate his or her child's screen time and instructional
105 technology use.
106 (5) The recommendations may include suggested changes
107 to state law.
108 (6) The report shall be presented to the state board
109 of education and to the joint committee on education in
110 public hearings. The report shall be updated at least every
111 two years to provide additional information regarding the
112 council's actions, recommendations, and policy proposals.
✓